Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.901

Effective date—1984 c 10.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect thirty days after it is signed by the governor and filed with the secretary of state.

[ 1984 c 10 s 16.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The effective date of this act [1984 c 10] was March 22, 1984.